Hawaii, session 2025, HB442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that growing demand for skilled nursing professionals is critical to addressing health care shortages and ensuring the well-being of Hawaii's communities.  Expanding nursing education programs of the University of Hawaii is essential to developing a robust workforce capable of meeting the needs of an aging population, addressing health care disparities in underserved areas, and responding to future public health challenges.  Investment in these programs not only strengthens Hawaii's health care system but also supports economic growth, improves health outcomes, and enhances the State's capacity to provide equitable and accessible care for all residents. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for various nursing programs of the university of Hawaii system. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $447,936 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for university of Hawaii, Manoa (UOH 100)-university of Hawaii, West Oahu nursing collaboration phase III. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $111,984 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii, Manoa (UOH 100) for the online RN to BS program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $424,364 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii, West Oahu (UOH 700) for the pre-nursing pathway. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $297,500 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and $595,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii at Hilo (UOH210) to increase its school of nursing cohort size. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________